Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 18, O.S.L. 2022


(70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3205.11), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 3205.11. A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Free


Speech Committee to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.


B. The Oklahoma Free Speech Committee shall be comprised of ten


(10) members to be appointed as follows:


1. Five persons to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of


the Senate including one member of the minority party and four


members of the majority party, of whom one member shall not be

Req. No. 3443 Page 1


serving in an elected or appointed leadership position in the


Senate; and


2. Five persons to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of


Representatives including one member of the minority party and four


members of the majority party, of whom one member shall not be


serving in an elected or appointed leadership position in the House


of Representatives.


C. Vacancies on the Committee shall be filled by the appointing


authority.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 18, O.S.L. 2022


(70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3205.13), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 3205.13. The Oklahoma Free Speech Committee shall


develop a process of collecting complaints of free speech violations


on public university the campuses of institutions of higher


education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education and


advise complainants of their rights. Universities Institutions of


higher education shall publish contact information on how to report


free speech concerns to the Oklahoma Free Speech Committee on its


website their websites and shall provide written notification of


such information to students during first-year orientation and at


least once within the first month of each semester of each academic


year the student is enrolled in the institution.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

Req. No. 3443 Page 2


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3443 EB 1/13/2026 5:22:45 PM





































Req. No. 3443 Page 3